Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB610.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 5666YC (3) 91 jda/jh H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 256.7, subsection 26, paragraph a, 1 unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as 2 follows: 3 Adopt a core curriculum and adopt rules that establish high 4 school graduation requirements for all students in school 5 districts and accredited nonpublic schools that include at a 6 minimum satisfactory completion of four years of English and 7 language arts, three years of mathematics, three years of 8 science, and three years of social studies , and, beginning 9 with students in the 2030-2031 school year graduating class, 10 one semester of computer science, or the trimester or quarter 11 equivalent, which may include computer science instruction 12 provided in grade eight pursuant to section 256.11, subsection 13 4 . 14 Sec. 2. Section 256.7, subsection 26, paragraph a, 15 subparagraph (4), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 16 (4) The rules shall provide for the establishment of 17 high-quality standards for computer science education taught 18 by elementary, middle, and high schools, in accordance with 19 the goal established under section 284.6A, subsection 1 , 20 setting a foundation for personal and professional success 21 in a high-technology, knowledge-based Iowa economy. The 22 high-quality standards for computer science education must 23 require that all levels and grades of computer science 24 instruction include instruction related to the fundamental 25 concepts of evolving computer science technologies and 26 artificial intelligence, including instruction that explains 27 what artificial intelligence is, how artificial intelligence 28 works, how artificial intelligence impacts society, and ethical 29 considerations related to the use of artificial intelligence. 30 Sec. 3. Section 256.9, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 31 following new subsections: 32 NEW SUBSECTION . 80. On or before June 30, 2027, publish 33 on the departmentâs internet site a list of computer science 34 courses that satisfy the rules adopted by the state board 35 -1- LSB 5666YC (3) 91 jda/jh 1/ 13 H.F. _____ pursuant to section 256.7, subsection 32, paragraph âcâ , and 1 that a school district or accredited nonpublic school may use 2 to implement the graduation requirement described in section 3 256.11, subsection 5, paragraph âlâ , subparagraph (2). The list 4 must include the names of the computer science courses and the 5 course codes associated with each computer science course. 6 NEW SUBSECTION . 81. Publish on the departmentâs internet 7 site all of the information submitted to the department by 8 school districts pursuant to section 256.11, subsection 5, 9 paragraph âlâ , subparagraph (3). 10 NEW SUBSECTION . 82. On or before June 30, 2027, create 11 and publish on the departmentâs internet site a plan to 12 expand statewide computer science teacher capacity to support 13 implementation of the graduation requirement described in 14 section 256.11, subsection 5, paragraph âlâ , subparagraph 15 (2). The plan must specifically address targeted support for 16 schools with a total enrollment of less than five hundred 17 students in grades nine through twelve. When creating the 18 plan, the department shall invite input from representatives of 19 kindergarten through grade twelve schools, including students, 20 computer science teacher professional development providers, 21 industries that employ technology workers, and higher education 22 institutions that offer computer science teacher preparation 23 pathways. 24 Sec. 4. Section 256.11, subsection 5, paragraph a, Code 25 2026, is amended by adding the following new subparagraph: 26 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (3) The five units of science may include 27 not more than one unit of instruction related to computer 28 science. 29 Sec. 5. Section 256.11, subsection 5, paragraphs e and l, 30 Code 2026, are amended to read as follows: 31 e. Two additional units of mathematics. 32 (1) The two additional units of mathematics may include 33 instruction related to applied sciences, technology, 34 engineering, or manufacturing, including transportation, 35 -2- LSB 5666YC (3) 91 jda/jh 2/ 13 H.F. _____ distribution, logistics, architecture, and construction, which 1 may be offered and taught through dedicated units of coursework 2 or through units of coursework that also meet the requirements 3 of the coursework required under paragraph âhâ , subparagraph 4 (1), subparagraph division (c). The state board shall adopt 5 rules pursuant to chapter 17A to implement this paragraph. 6 (2) The two additional units of mathematics may include not 7 more than one unit of instruction related to computer science. 8 (3) The state board shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 9 17A to implement this paragraph. 10 l. (1) One-half unit of computer science commencing with 11 the school year beginning July 1, 2022 . The one-half unit of 12 computer science shall incorporate the standards established 13 pursuant to section 256.7, subsection 26 , paragraph âaâ , 14 subparagraph (4) , and may be offered online in accordance 15 with rules adopted pursuant to section 256.7, subsection 32 , 16 paragraph âaâ . The one-half unit of computer science shall 17 satisfy all of the following requirements: 18 (a) Be of high quality. 19 (b) Meet or exceed the curriculum standards and 20 requirements established by the state board. 21 (c) Be offered and taught in a traditional classroom 22 setting; provided, however, that if a traditional classroom 23 setting is not feasible, the one-half unit of computer science 24 may be offered and taught in any of the following ways: 25 (i) Through a combination of instruction that is delivered 26 in a traditional classroom setting and instruction that is 27 delivered primarily over the internet. 28 (ii) Through instruction that is delivered primarily over 29 the internet in accordance with rules adopted by the state 30 board pursuant to section 256.7, subsection 32, paragraph 31 âaâ , and is tailored to meet the needs of each participating 32 student. 33 (2) (a) All students, beginning with students in the 34 2030-2031 school year graduating class, shall complete one-half 35 -3- LSB 5666YC (3) 91 jda/jh 3/ 13 H.F. _____ unit of computer science as a condition of graduation, which 1 may include computer science instruction provided in grade 2 eight pursuant to section 256.11, subsection 4. The condition 3 of graduation shall not apply to a student who enrolls in a 4 school district or an accredited nonpublic school in grade 5 twelve immediately after being enrolled in a school located 6 outside of this state that does not impose a comparable 7 computer science instruction requirement. 8 (b) (i) On or before July 1, 2030, a school district or 9 accredited nonpublic school may apply to the department of 10 education for a one-time waiver of the implementation of the 11 condition of graduation described in this subparagraph. The 12 waiver shall be for a period not longer than one school year. 13 (ii) The state board shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 14 17A establishing standards for the submission of applications 15 for waivers of the implementation of the condition of 16 graduation described in this subparagraph and the departmentâs 17 consideration and approval of waivers. The rules must 18 require that the department of education may only approve an 19 application for a waiver submitted pursuant to subparagraph 20 subdivision (i) if the school district or accredited nonpublic 21 school applying for the waiver demonstrates to the department 22 that the school district or accredited nonpublic school made 23 a reasonable attempt to implement the condition of graduation 24 described in this subparagraph. 25 (iii) This subparagraph division is repealed July 1, 2031. 26 (3) Each school district shall report annually to the 27 department all of the following: 28 (a) The course names and course codes associated with all 29 computer science courses offered and taught in the school 30 district pursuant to this paragraph and, to the extent such 31 information is available, a description of the format in which 32 each course is offered and taught. 33 (b) The number of teachers employed by the school district 34 who teach computer science instruction, sortable by the 35 -4- LSB 5666YC (3) 91 jda/jh 4/ 13 H.F. _____ endorsements and authorizations held by each teacher and the 1 highest academic degree attained by each teacher. The report 2 shall not include any personally identifiable information 3 related to the teachers employed by the school district who 4 teach computer science instruction. 5 (c) The number of students enrolled in a computer science 6 course offered and taught by the school district pursuant to 7 this paragraph, sortable by the grade level of each student. 8 The report shall not include any personally identifiable 9 information related to the students enrolled in a computer 10 science course offered and taught by the school district. 11 Sec. 6. Section 256.11, subsection 5, paragraph h, Code 12 2026, is amended by adding the following new subparagraph: 13 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (04) Units of instruction provided 14 under subparagraph (1), subparagraph division (b) or (c), may 15 include up to one unit of instruction related to computer 16 science, if the teacher providing such instruction has either 17 an initial career and technical education authorization issued 18 by the board of educational examiners or a career and technical 19 education authorization issued by the board of educational 20 examiners. 21 Sec. 7. Section 256.13, Code 2026, is amended to read as 22 follows: 23 256.13 Nonresident pupils. 24 The boards of directors of two or more school districts may 25 by agreement provide for attendance of pupils residing in one 26 district in the schools of another district for the purpose of 27 taking courses not offered in the district of their residence , 28 including computer science courses described in section 256.11, 29 subsection 5, paragraph âlâ . The boards may also provide by 30 agreement that the districts will combine their enrollments 31 for one or more grades. Courses and grades made available to 32 students in this manner shall be considered as complying with 33 any standards or laws requiring the offering of such courses 34 and grades. The boards of directors of districts entering into 35 -5- LSB 5666YC (3) 91 jda/jh 5/ 13 H.F. _____ such agreements may provide for sharing the costs and expenses 1 of the courses. If the agreement provides for whole grade 2 sharing, the costs and expenses shall be paid as provided in 3 sections 282.10 through 282.12 . 4 Sec. 8. Section 256.16, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended 5 by adding the following new paragraph: 6 NEW PARAGRAPH . p. Include preparation in computer science, 7 artificial intelligence, and computational thinking that is 8 appropriate to the grade level and subject area in which 9 the student who is enrolled in the practitioner preparation 10 program will teach. A higher education institution providing 11 practitioner preparation may satisfy this requirement by 12 requiring a student who is enrolled in the practitioner 13 preparation program to complete a dedicated course or 14 module, or by integrating such preparation into the existing 15 practitioner preparation program. 16 Sec. 9. Section 256.146, subsection 19, Code 2026, is 17 amended to read as follows: 18 19. Adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A establishing 19 endorsements and authorizations for computer science 20 instruction , including . The rules shall include traditional 21 and nontraditional pathways for obtaining such endorsements or 22 authorizations , including through instruction that is delivered 23 primarily over the internet that may be used to demonstrate 24 competence in computer science instruction for teachers under 25 an initial or conditional license . 26 Sec. 10. Section 262.9, subsection 3, Code 2026, is amended 27 to read as follows: 28 3. a. Make rules for admission to and for the government of 29 said the institutions of higher learning , not inconsistent with 30 law. 31 b. The rules described in paragraph âaâ must require 32 that, if an applicant for admission to an institution of 33 higher learning uses a computer science course to fulfill any 34 requirements related to units of science instruction under 35 -6- LSB 5666YC (3) 91 jda/jh 6/ 13 H.F. _____ section 256.11, subsection 5, paragraph âaâ , subparagraph (3), 1 or any requirements related to units of mathematics instruction 2 under section 256.11, subsection 5, paragraph âeâ , subparagraph 3 (2), then the institution of higher learning must accept the 4 unit or units of instruction related to computer science as 5 equivalent to the corresponding science or mathematics unit 6 of instruction for purposes of the calculation of the regent 7 admission index. 8 Sec. 11. Section 262.9, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 9 following new subsection: 10 NEW SUBSECTION . 43. Develop, in consultation with the 11 institutions of higher education governed by the board, 12 guidance related to how a higher education institution 13 providing practitioner preparation can best incorporate 14 preparation related to computer science, artificial 15 intelligence, and computational thinking into the approved 16 practitioner preparation program, as required under section 17 256.16, subsection 1, paragraph âpâ , and distribute such 18 guidance to each higher education institution providing 19 practitioner preparation. 20 Sec. 12. Section 284.6A, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended 21 by adding the following new paragraph: 22 NEW PARAGRAPH . 0c. In order to provide students with the 23 competencies to compete in a twenty-first century workforce, 24 develop skills that translate into high-wage jobs, develop 25 problem solving and critical thinking skills, and encourage 26 the creation and retention of new, high-wage jobs in this 27 state, all high school students enrolled in school districts 28 or accredited nonpublic schools, beginning with the 2030-2031 29 school year graduating class, students should complete one 30 semester of computer science as a condition of graduation as 31 required by section 256.7, subsection 26, paragraph âaâ . 32 Sec. 13. Section 284.6A, subsection 2, paragraph b, Code 33 2026, is amended to read as follows: 34 b. A school district or accredited nonpublic school may 35 -7- LSB 5666YC (3) 91 jda/jh 7/ 13 H.F. _____ apply to the department, in the manner prescribed by the 1 department, to receive moneys from the fund to provide tuition 2 reimbursement for Iowa teachers , including Iowa teachers under 3 an initial or conditional license, seeking endorsements or 4 authorizations for computer science under section 256.146, 5 subsection 19 . 6 Sec. 14. STATE MANDATE FUNDING SPECIFIED. In accordance 7 with section 25B.2, subsection 3, the state cost of requiring 8 compliance with any state mandate included in this Act shall 9 be paid by a school district from state school foundation aid 10 received by the school district under section 257.16, and from 11 any grants received under the computer science professional 12 development fund established pursuant to section 284.6A. This 13 specification of the payment of the state cost shall be deemed 14 to meet all of the state funding-related requirements of 15 section 25B.2, subsection 3, and no additional state funding 16 shall be necessary for the full implementation of this Act 17 by and enforcement of this Act against all affected school 18 districts. 19 Sec. 15. APPLICABILITY. The following applies to students 20 admitted to an approved practitioner preparation program on or 21 after July 1, 2028: 22 The section of this Act amending section 256.16. 23